nb: Bruk av splitter: Lyd; Koaksial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Strøm; USB; VGA; Video; Annet
zh-CN: 分离器用途: 音频; 同轴; DVI; 以太网; HDMI; 供电设备; USB; VGA; 视频; 其他
en: Splitter use: Audio; Coaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Power; USB; VGA; Video; Other
th: การใช้ตัวแยกสัญญาณ: เสียง; โคแอกเซียล; DVI; อีเทอร์เน็ต; HDMI; ส่งกำลัง; USB; VGA; วิดีโอ; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Uso do divisor: Áudio; Coaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Potente; USB; VGA; Vídeo; Outro
zh-TW: 分配器用途: 音訊設備; 同軸; DVI; 乙太網路; HDMI; 電源; USB; VGA; 視訊/影音; 其他
sk-SK: Použitie rozdeľovača: Zvuk; Koaxiálny; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Napájanie; USB; VGA; Video; Iné
da: Brug af splitter: Lyd; Koaksial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Strøm; USB; VGA; Video; Andet
fi: Halkaisimen käyttö: Audio; Koaksiaalinen; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Virta; USB; VGA; Video; Muu
fr: Utilisation du séparateur: Audio; Coaxiale; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Puissance; USB; VGA; Vidéo; Autre
it: Utilizzo dello sdoppiatore: Audio; Coassiale; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Alimentazione; USB; VGA; Video; Altro
vi: Mục đích sử dụng bộ chia: Âm thanh; Đồng trục; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Bánh xe điện; USB; VGA; Video; Khác
pt-PT: Uso de splitter: Áudio; Coaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Energia; USB; VGA; Vídeo; Outro
hu: Elosztó használata: Hang; Koaxiális; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Áram; USB; VGA; Videó; Egyéb
ja: スプリッターの使用: オーディオ; 同軸; DVI; イーサネット; HDMI; 電力; USB; VGA; ビデオ; その他
el: Χρήση διαχωριστή: Ήχος; Ομοαξονικό καλώδιο; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Ισχύς; USB; VGA; Βίντεο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Uporaba razdelilnika: Audio; Koaksialna; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Električni; USB; VGA; Video; Drugo
ko: 스플리터 용도: 오디오; 동축; DVI; 이더넷; HDMI; 전력; USB; VGA; 비디오; 기타
bg-BG: Използване на сплитер: Аудио; Коаксиален; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Захранване; USB; VGA; Видео; Други
sv: Användningsområde för fördelare: Ljud; Koaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Ström; USB; VGA; Video; Övrigt
es: Uso del duplicador: Audio; Coaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Potencia; USB; VGA; Video; Otros
tr: Ayırıcı Kullanımı: Ses; Koaksiyel; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Güç; USB; VGA; Video; Diğer
nl: Splittergebruik: Audio; Coaxiaal; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Power; USB; VGA; Video; Andere
ru: Использование сплиттера: Аудио; Коаксиальный; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Электропитание; USB; VGA; Видео; Другое
lt-LT: Karpymo įrenginio naudojimas: Garsas; Bendraašis; DVI; Eternetas; HDMI; Maitinimas; USB; VGA; Vaizdo; Kita
pl: Zastosowanie rozdzielacza: Audio; Współosiowy; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Moc; USB; VGA; Video; Inne
ro-RO: Utilizare splitter: Audio; Coaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Alimentare; USB; VGA; Video; Altele
cs: Použití splitteru: Zvuk; Koaxiální; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Napájení; USB; VGA; Video; Jiné
de: Verwendung von Verteilern: Audio; Koaxial; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Leistung; USB; VGA; Video; Sonstiges
hr-HR: Upotreba razdjelnika: Audioveza; Koaksijalna veza; DVI; Ethernet; HDMI; Napajanje; USB; VGA; Videoveza; Ostalo